California statutes. Vehicle Code
In the alternative to the procedure under Sections 13950, 13951, and 13952 and in the event the department determines upon investigation or reexamination that the safety of the person subject to investigation or reexamination or other persons upon the highways require such action, the department shall forthwith and without hearing suspend or revoke the privilege of the person to operate a motor vehicle or impose reasonable terms and conditions of probation which shall be relative to the safe operation of a motor vehicle. No order of suspension or revocation or the imposition of terms or conditions of probation shall become effective until 30 days after the giving of written notice thereof to the person affected, except that the department shall have authority to make any such order effective immediately upon the giving of notice when in its opinion because of the mental or physical condition of the person such immediate action is required for the safety of the driver or other persons upon the highways.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1969, Ch. 1045.)
-------------------------------------------

13954.

(a) Notwithstanding any other provision of this code, the department immediately shall suspend or revoke the driving privilege of a person who the department has reasonable cause to believe was in some manner involved in a crash while operating a motor vehicle under the following circumstances at the time of the crash:

(1) The person had 0.08 percent or more, by weight, of alcohol in their blood.

(2) They proximately caused the crash as a result of an act prohibited, or the neglect of any duty imposed, by law.

(3) The crash occurred within five years of the date of a violation of subdivision (b) of Section 191.5 of the Penal Code
 that resulted in a conviction.

(b) If a crash described in subdivision (a) does not result in a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, the department shall suspend the driving privilege under this section for one year from the date of commencement of the original suspension. After the one-year suspension period, the driving privilege may be reinstated if evidence establishes to the satisfaction of the department that no grounds exist that would authorize the refusal to issue a license and that reinstatement of the driving privilege would not jeopardize the safety of the person or other persons upon the highways, and if the person gives proof of financial responsibility, as defined in Section 16430.

(c) If a crash described in subdivision (a)
 does result in a conviction or finding of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153, the department shall revoke the driving privilege under this section for three years from the date of commencement of the original revocation. After the three-year revocation period, the driving privilege may be reinstated if evidence establishes to the satisfaction of the department that no grounds exist that would authorize the refusal to issue a license and that reinstatement of the driving privilege would not jeopardize the safety of the person or other persons upon the highways, and if the person gives proof of financial responsibility.

(d) Any revocation action under subdivision (c) shall be imposed as follows:

(1) If the crash results in a first conviction of a violation of Section 23152
 or 23153, or if the person was convicted of a separate violation of Section 23152 or 23153 that occurred within five years of the crash, the period of revocation under subdivision (c) shall be concurrent with any period of restriction, suspension, or revocation imposed under Section 13352, 13352.4, or 13352.5.

(2) If the person was convicted of two or more separate violations of Section 23152 or 23153, or both, that occurred within five years of the crash, the period of revocation under subdivision (c) shall be cumulative and shall be imposed consecutively with any period of restriction, suspension, or revocation imposed under Section 13352 or 13352.5.

(e) The department immediately shall notify the person in writing of the action taken and, upon the person’s request in writing and
 within 15 days from the date of receipt of that request, shall grant the person an opportunity for a hearing in the same manner and under the same conditions as provided in Article 3 (commencing with Section 14100) of Chapter 3, except as otherwise provided in this section. For purposes of this section, the scope of the hearing shall cover the following issues:

(1) Whether the peace officer had reasonable cause to believe the person had been driving a motor vehicle in violation of Section 23152 or 23153.

(2) Whether the person had been placed under lawful arrest.

(3) Whether a chemical test of the person’s blood, breath, or urine indicated that the blood-alcohol level was 0.08 percent or more, by weight, at the time of
 testing.

If the department determines, upon a hearing of the matter, that the person had not been placed under lawful arrest, or that a chemical test of the person’s blood, breath, or urine did not indicate a blood-alcohol level of 0.08 percent or more, by weight, at the time of testing, the suspension or revocation shall be terminated immediately.

(f) This section applies if the crash occurred on or after January 1, 1990, without regard for the dates of the violations referred to in subdivisions (a) and (d).

(g) Notwithstanding subdivision (f), if a person’s privilege to operate a motor vehicle is required to be suspended or revoked pursuant to this section as it read before January 1, 1990, as a result of a crash that occurred before
 January 1, 1990, the privilege shall be suspended or revoked pursuant to this section as it read before January 1, 1990.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 81, Sec. 4.   (AB 2198)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Hearing [14100. - 14112.]

14100.

(a) Whenever the department has given notice, or has taken or proposes to take action under Section 12804.15, 13353, 13353.2, 13950, 13951, 13952, or 13953, the person receiving the notice or subject to the action may, within 10 days, demand a hearing which shall be granted, except as provided in Section 14101.

(b) An application for a hearing does not stay the action by the department for which the notice is given.

(c) The fact that a person has the right to request an administrative hearing within 10 days after receipt of the notice of the order of suspension under this section and Section 16070, and that the request is required to be made within 10 days in order to receive a determination prior to the effective date of the suspension shall be made prominent on the notice.

(d) The department shall make available notices, to accompany the notice provided pursuant to this section, that provide the information required pursuant to subdivision (c) in all non-English languages spoken by a substantial number of the public served by the department, and shall distribute the notices as it determines is appropriate.

(e) The department shall implement the provisions of subdivisions (c) and (d) as soon as practicable, but not later than January 1, 1994.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2001, Ch. 658, Sec. 5.   Effective October 10, 2001.)
-------------------------------------------

14100.1.

Hearings granted on refusal, suspension, or revocation of a passenger transportation vehicle or hazardous materials endorsement, or farm labor vehicle certificate shall be conducted according to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 13800) of Division 6.

(History: Added by Stats. 1990, Ch. 1360, Sec. 42.)
-------------------------------------------

14101.

A person is not entitled to a hearing in either of the following cases:

(a) If the action by the department is made mandatory by this code. 

(b) If the person has previously been given an opportunity with appropriate notice for a hearing and failed to request a hearing within the time specified by law.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 13, Sec. 32.   Effective February 13, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

14103.

Failure to respond to a notice given under this chapter within 10 days is a waiver of the right to a hearing, and the department may take action without a hearing or may, upon request of the person whose privilege of driving is in question, or at its own option, reopen the question, take evidence, change, or set aside any order previously made, or grant a hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 13, Sec. 34.   Effective February 13, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.

If the department grants a hearing as provided in this chapter, it shall fix a time and place for the hearing and shall give 10 days’ notice of the hearing to the applicant or licensee. The notice of hearing shall also include a statement of the discovery rights of the applicant or licensee to review the department’s records prior to the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 13, Sec. 35.   Effective February 13, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.2.

(a) Any hearing shall be conducted by the director or by a hearing officer or hearing board appointed by him or her from officers or employees of the department. 

(b) The entire proceedings at any hearing may be recorded by a phonographic recorder or by mechanical, electronic, or other means capable of reproduction or transcription.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 13, Sec. 36.   Effective February 13, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.5.

(a) Before a hearing has commenced, the department, or the hearing officer or hearing board, shall issue subpoenas or subpoenas duces tecum, or both, at the request of any party, for attendance or production of documents at the hearing. After the hearing has commenced, the department, if it is hearing the case, or the hearing officer sitting alone, or the hearing board, may issue subpoenas or subpoenas duces tecum, or both.

(b) Notwithstanding Section 11450.20 of the Government Code, subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum issued in conjunction with the hearings may be served by first-class mail.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 32.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14104.7.

At any hearing, the department shall consider its official records and may receive sworn testimony. At the hearing, or subsequent to the hearing with the consent of the applicant or licensee, any or all of the following may be submitted as evidence concerning any fact relating to the ability of the applicant or licensee to safely operate a motor vehicle:

(a) Reports of attending or examining physicians and surgeons. 

(b) Reports of special investigators appointed by the department to investigate and report upon any facts relating to the ability of the person to operate a vehicle safely. 

(c) Properly authenticated reports of hospital records, excerpts from expert testimony received by the department or a hearing board upon similar issues of scientific fact in other cases, and the prior decision of the director upon those issues.

(History: Added by Stats. 1991, Ch. 13, Sec. 38.   Effective February 13, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.

(a) Upon the conclusion of a hearing, the hearing officer or hearing board shall make findings and render a decision on behalf of the department and shall notify the person involved. Notice of the decision shall include a statement of the person’s right to a review. The decision shall take effect as stated in the notice, but not less than four nor more than 15 days after the notice is mailed.

(b) The decision may be modified at any time after issuance to correct mistakes or clerical errors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 33.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14105.5.

(a) The person subject to a hearing may request a review of the decision taken under Section 14105 within 15 days of the effective date of the decision.

(b) On receipt of a request for review, the department shall stay the action pending a decision on review, unless the hearing followed an action pursuant to Section 13353, 13353.2, or 13953. The review shall include an examination of the hearing report, documentary evidence, and findings. The hearing officer or hearing board conducting the original hearing may not participate in the review process.

(c) Following the review, a written notice of the department’s decision shall be mailed to the person involved. If the action has been stayed pending review, the department’s decision shall take effect as stated in the notice, but not less than four nor more than 15 days after the notice is mailed.

(d) The decision may be modified at any time after issuance to correct mistakes or clerical errors.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 724, Sec. 34.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

14106.

Following the mailing of the notice of the department’s decision pursuant to Section 14105.5, the department, at its own option or upon the request of the person whose privilege of driving is in question, may reopen the question, take further evidence, or change or set aside any order previously made.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 13, Sec. 41.   Effective February 13, 1991.)
-------------------------------------------

14112.

(a) All matters in a hearing not covered by this chapter shall be governed, as far as applicable, by Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code.

(b) Subdivision (a) of Section 11425.30 of the Government Code does not apply to a proceeding for issuance, denial, revocation, or suspension of a driver’s license pursuant to this division.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 193, Sec. 196.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 4. Probation [14250. - 14253.]

14250.

Whenever by any provision of this code the department has discretionary authority to suspend or revoke the privilege of a person to operate a motor vehicle, the department may in lieu of suspension or revocation place the person on probation, the terms of which may include a suspension as a condition of probation, issuing a probationary license with such reasonable terms and conditions as shall be deemed by the department to be appropriate.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1963, Ch. 154.)
-------------------------------------------

14250.5.

The department, as a condition of probation, may require a person whose privilege to operate a motor vehicle is subject to suspension or revocation to attend, for not to exceed 24 hours, the program authorized by the provisions of Section 1659.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

14251.

The department shall have authority to terminate or to modify the terms or conditions of any order of probation whenever good cause appears therefor.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14252.

The department upon receiving satisfactory evidence of a violation of any of the terms or conditions of probation imposed under this code, may withdraw the probationary license and order the suspension or revocation of the privilege to operate a motor vehicle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14253.

Unless probation was imposed for a cause which is continuing, the probationer, after not less than one year, may request in writing the termination of the probation and the return of his regular license. Upon a showing that there has been no violation of the terms or conditions of the probation for a period of one year immediately preceding the request, the department shall terminate the probation and either restore to the person his driver’s license or require an application for a new license.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 5. Review of Orders [14400. - 14401.]

14400.

Nothing in this code shall be deemed to prevent a review or other action as may be permitted by the Constitution and laws of this State by a court of competent jurisdiction of any order of the department refusing, canceling, suspending, or revoking the privilege of a person to operate a motor vehicle.

(History: Enacted by Stats. 1959, Ch. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

14401.

(a) Any action brought in a court of competent jurisdiction to review any order of the department refusing, canceling, placing on probation, suspending, or revoking the privilege of a person to operate a motor vehicle shall be commenced within 90 days from the date the order is noticed.

(b) Upon final completion of all administrative appeals, the person whose driving privilege was refused, canceled, placed on probation, suspended, or revoked shall be given written notice by the department of his or her right to a review by a court pursuant to subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1985, Ch. 1008, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Violation of License Provisions [14600. - 14611.]

14600.

(a) Whenever any person after applying for or receiving a driver’s license moves to a new residence, or acquires a new mailing address different from the address shown in the application or in the license as issued, he or she shall within 10 days thereafter notify the department of both the old and new address. The department may issue a document to accompany the driver’s license reflecting the new address of the holder of the license.

(b) When, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 12951, a driver presents his or her driver’s license to a peace officer, he or she shall, if applicable, also present the document issued pursuant to subdivision (a) if the driver’s license does not reflect the driver’s current residence or mailing address.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1992, Ch. 1243, Sec. 86.4.   Effective September 30, 1992.)
-------------------------------------------

14601.

(a) No person shall drive a motor vehicle at any time when that person’s driving privilege is suspended or revoked for reckless driving in violation of Section 23103, 23104, or 23105, any reason listed in subdivision (a) or (c) of Section 12806 authorizing the department to refuse to issue a license, negligent or incompetent operation of a motor vehicle as prescribed in subdivision (e) of Section 12809, or negligent operation as prescribed in Section 12810.5, if the person so driving has knowledge of the suspension or revocation. Knowledge shall be conclusively presumed if mailed notice has been given by the department to the person pursuant to Section 13106. The presumption established by this subdivision is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(b) A person convicted under this section shall be punished as follows:

(1) Upon a first conviction, by imprisonment in a county jail for not less than five days or more than six months and by a fine of not less than three hundred dollars ($300) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) If the offense occurred within five years of a prior offense that resulted in a conviction of a violation of this section or Section 14601.1, 14601.2, or 14601.5, by imprisonment in a county jail for not less than 10 days or more than one year and by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(c) If the offense occurred within five years of a prior offense that resulted in a conviction of a violation of this section or Section 14601.1, 14601.2, or 14601.5, and is granted probation, the court shall impose as a condition of probation that the person be confined in a county jail for at least 10 days.

(d) Nothing in this section prohibits a person from driving a motor vehicle, that is owned or utilized by the person’s employer, during the course of employment on private property that is owned or utilized by the employer, except an offstreet parking facility as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 12500.

(e) When the prosecution agrees to a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a charge of a violation of this section in satisfaction of, or as a substitute for, an original charge of a violation of Section 14601.2, and the court accepts that plea, except, in the interest of justice, when the court finds it would be inappropriate, the court shall, pursuant to Section 23575, require the person convicted, in addition to any other requirements, to install a certified ignition interlock device on any vehicle that the person owns or operates for a period not to exceed three years.

(f) This section also applies to the operation of an off-highway motor vehicle on those lands to which the Chappie-Z’berg Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Law of 1971 (Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000)) applies as to off-highway motor vehicles, as described in Section 38001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 682, Sec. 14.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

14601.1.

(a) No person shall drive a motor vehicle when his or her driving privilege is suspended or revoked for any reason other than those listed in Section 14601, 14601.2, or 14601.5, if the person so driving has knowledge of the suspension or revocation. Knowledge shall be conclusively presumed if mailed notice has been given by the department to the person pursuant to Section 13106. The presumption established by this subdivision is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(b) Any person convicted under this section shall be punished as follows:

(1) Upon a first conviction, by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months or by a fine of not less than three hundred dollars ($300) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) If the offense occurred within five years of a prior offense which resulted in a conviction of a violation of this section or Section 14601, 14601.2, or 14601.5, by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than five days or more than one year and by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(c) Nothing in this section prohibits a person from driving a motor vehicle, which is owned or utilized by the person’s employer, during the course of employment on private property which is owned or utilized by the employer, except an offstreet parking facility as defined in subdivision (d) of Section 12500.

(d) When the prosecution agrees to a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a charge of a violation of this section in satisfaction of, or as a substitute for, an original charge of a violation of Section 14601.2, and the court accepts that plea, except, in the interest of justice, when the court finds it would be inappropriate, the court shall, pursuant to Section 23575, require the person convicted, in addition to any other requirements, to install a certified ignition interlock device on any vehicle that the person owns or operates for a period not to exceed three years.

(e) This section also applies to the operation of an off-highway motor vehicle on those lands to which the Chappie-Z’berg Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Law of 1971 (Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000)) applies as to off-highway motor vehicles, as described in Section 38001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 908, Sec. 15.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14601.2.

(a) A person shall not drive a motor vehicle at any time when that person’s driving privilege is suspended or revoked for a conviction of a violation of Section 23152 or 23153 if the person so driving has knowledge of the suspension or revocation.

(b) Except in full compliance with the restriction, a person shall not drive a motor vehicle at any time when that person’s driving privilege is restricted if the person so driving has knowledge of the restriction.

(c) Knowledge of the suspension or revocation of the driving privilege shall be conclusively presumed if mailed notice has been given by the department to the
 person pursuant to Section 13106. Knowledge of the restriction of the driving privilege shall be presumed if notice has been given by the court to the person. The presumption established by this subdivision is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(d) A person convicted of a violation of this section shall be punished as follows:

(1) Upon a first conviction, by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 10 days or more than six months and by a fine of not less than three hundred dollars ($300) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), unless the person has been designated a habitual traffic offender under subdivision (b) of Section 23546, subdivision (b) of Section 23550, or subdivision (d) of Section 23550.5, in which case the person, in addition, shall be sentenced as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 14601.3.

(2) If the offense occurred within five years of a prior offense that resulted in a conviction of a violation of this section or Section 14601, 14601.1, or 14601.5, by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 30 days or more than one year and by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than two thousand dollars ($2,000), unless the person has been designated a habitual traffic offender under subdivision (b) of Section 23546, subdivision (b) of Section 23550, or subdivision (d) of Section 23550.5, in which case the person, in addition, shall be sentenced as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e) of Section 14601.3.

(e) If a person is convicted of a first offense under this section and is granted probation, the court shall impose as a condition of probation that the person be confined in the county jail for at least 10 days.

(f) If the offense occurred within five years of a prior offense that resulted in a conviction of a violation of this section or Section 14601, 14601.1, or 14601.5 and is granted probation, the court shall impose as a condition of probation that the person be confined in the county jail for at least 30 days.

(g) If a person is convicted of a second or subsequent offense that results in a conviction of this section within seven years, but over five years, of a prior offense that resulted in a conviction of a violation of this section or Section 14601, 14601.1, or 14601.5 and is granted probation, the court shall impose as a condition of probation that the person be confined in the county jail for at least 10 days.

(h) Pursuant to Section 23575, the court shall require a person convicted of a violation of this section to
 install a certified ignition interlock device on a vehicle the person owns or operates. Upon receipt of the abstract of a conviction under this section, the department shall not reinstate the privilege to operate a motor vehicle until the department receives proof of either the “Verification of Installation” form as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (h) of Section 13386 or the Judicial Council Form I.D. 100.

(i) This section does not prohibit a person who is participating in, or has completed, an alcohol or drug rehabilitation program from driving a motor vehicle that is owned or utilized by the person’s employer, during the course of employment on private property that is owned or utilized by the employer, except an offstreet parking facility, as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 12500.

(j) This section also applies to the operation of an off-highway motor vehicle on
 those lands that the Chappie-Z’berg Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Law of 1971 (Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000)) applies as to off-highway motor vehicles, as described in Section 38001.

(k) If Section 23573 is applicable, then subdivision (h) is not applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 71, Sec. 173.   (SB 1304)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

14601.3.

(a) It is unlawful for a person whose driving privilege has been suspended or revoked to accumulate a driving record history which results from driving during the period of suspension or revocation. A person who violates this subdivision is designated an habitual traffic offender.

For purposes of this section, a driving record history means any of the following, if the driving occurred during any period of suspension or revocation:

(1) Two or more convictions within a 12-month period of an offense given a violation point count of two pursuant to Section 12810.

(2) Three or more convictions within a 12-month period of an offense given a violation point count of one pursuant to Section 12810.

(3) Three or more accidents within a 12-month period that are subject to the reporting requirements of Section 16000.

(4) Any combination of convictions or accidents, as specified in paragraphs (1) to (3), inclusive, which results during any 12-month period in a violation point count of three or more pursuant to Section 12810.

(b) Knowledge of suspension or revocation of the driving privilege shall be conclusively presumed if mailed notice has been given by the department to the person pursuant to Section 13106. The presumption established by this subdivision is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(c) The department, within 30 days of receipt of a duly certified abstract of the record of any court or accident report which results in a person being designated an habitual traffic offender, may execute and transmit by mail a notice of that designation to the office of the district attorney having jurisdiction over the location of the person’s last known address as contained in the department’s records.

(d) (1) The district attorney, within 30 days of receiving the notice required in subdivision (c), shall inform the department of whether or not the person will be prosecuted for being an habitual traffic offender.

(2) Notwithstanding any other provision of this section, any habitual traffic offender designated under subdivision (b) of Section 23546, subdivision (b) of Section 23550, or subdivision (b) of Section 23550.5, who is convicted of violating Section 14601.2 shall be sentenced as provided in paragraph (3) of subdivision (e).

(e) Any person convicted under this section of being an habitual traffic offender shall be punished as follows:

(1) Upon a first conviction, by imprisonment in the county jail for 30 days and by a fine of one thousand dollars ($1,000).

(2) Upon a second or any subsequent offense within seven years of a prior conviction under this section, by imprisonment in the county jail for 180 days and by a fine of two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(3) Any habitual traffic offender designated under Section 193.7 of the Penal Code or under subdivision (b) of Section 23546, subdivision (b) of Section 23550, subdivision (b) of Section 23550.5, or subdivision (d) of Section 23566 who is convicted of a violation of Section 14601.2 shall be punished by imprisonment in the county jail for 180 days and by a fine of two thousand dollars ($2,000). The penalty in this paragraph shall be consecutive to that imposed for the violation of any other law.

(f) This section also applies to the operation of an off-highway motor vehicle on those lands to which the Chappie-Z’berg Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Law of 1971 (Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000)) applies as to off-highway motor vehicles, as described in Section 38001.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 908, Sec. 17.   Effective January 1, 2005.)
-------------------------------------------

14601.4.

(a) It is unlawful for a person, while driving a vehicle with a license suspended or revoked pursuant to Section 14601.2 to do an act forbidden by law or neglect a duty imposed by law in the driving of the vehicle, which act or neglect proximately causes bodily injury to a person other than the driver. In proving the person neglected a duty imposed by law in the driving of the vehicle, it is not necessary to prove that a specific section of this code was violated.

(b) A person convicted under this section shall be imprisoned in the county jail and shall not be released upon work release, community service, or other release program before the minimum period of imprisonment, prescribed in Section 14601.2, is served. If a person is convicted of that offense and is granted probation, the court shall require that the person convicted serve at least the minimum time of imprisonment, as specified in those sections, as a term or condition of probation.

(c) When the prosecution agrees to a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a charge of a violation of this section in satisfaction of, or as a substitute for, an original charge of a violation of Section 14601.2, and the court accepts that plea, except, in the interest of justice, when the court finds it should be inappropriate, the court shall, pursuant to Section 23575, require the person convicted, in addition to other requirements, to install a certified ignition interlock device on a vehicle that the person owns or operates for a period not to exceed three years.

(d) This section also applies to the operation of an off-highway motor vehicle on those lands that the Chappie-Z’berg Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Law of 1971 (Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000)) applies as to off-highway motor vehicles, as described in Section 38001.

(e) Upon receipt of the abstract of a conviction under this section, the department shall not reinstate the privilege to operate a motor vehicle until the department receives proof of either the “Verification of Installation” form as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386 or the Judicial Council Form I.D. 100.

(f) If Section 23573 is applicable, then subdivisions (c) and (e) are not applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 404, Sec. 2.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14601.5.

(a) A person shall not drive a motor vehicle at any time when that person’s driving privilege is suspended or revoked pursuant to Section 13353, 13353.1, or 13353.2 and that person has knowledge of the suspension or revocation.

(b) Except in full compliance with the restriction, a person shall not drive a motor vehicle at any time when that person’s driving privilege is restricted pursuant to Section 13353.7 or 13353.8 and that person has knowledge of the restriction.

(c) Knowledge of suspension, revocation, or restriction of the driving privilege shall be conclusively presumed if notice has been given by the department to the person pursuant to Section 13106. The presumption established by this subdivision is a presumption affecting the burden of proof.

(d) A person convicted of a violation of this section is punishable, as follows:

(1) Upon a first conviction, by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months or by a fine of not less than three hundred dollars ($300) or more than one thousand dollars ($1,000), or by both that fine and imprisonment.

(2) If the offense occurred within five years of a prior offense that resulted in a conviction for a violation of this section or Section 14601, 14601.1, 14601.2, or 14601.3, by imprisonment in the county jail for not less than 10 days or more than one year, and by a fine of not less than five hundred dollars ($500) or more than two thousand dollars ($2,000).

(e) In imposing the minimum fine required by subdivision (d), the court shall take into consideration the defendant’s ability to pay the fine and may, in the interest of justice, and for reasons stated in the record, reduce the amount of that minimum fine to less than the amount otherwise imposed.

(f) This section does not prohibit a person who is participating in, or has completed, an alcohol or drug rehabilitation program from driving a motor vehicle, that is owned or utilized by the person’s employer, during the course of employment on private property that is owned or utilized by the employer, except an offstreet parking facility as defined in subdivision (c) of Section 12500.

(g) When the prosecution agrees to a plea of guilty or nolo contendere to a charge of a violation of this section in satisfaction of, or as a substitute for, an original charge of a violation of Section 14601.2, and the court accepts that plea, except, in the interest of justice, when the court finds it would be inappropriate, the court shall, pursuant to Section 23575, require the person convicted, in addition to other requirements, to install a certified ignition interlock device on a vehicle that the person owns or operates for a period not to exceed three years.

(h) This section also applies to the operation of an off-highway motor vehicle on those lands that the Chappie-Z’berg Off-Highway Motor Vehicle Law of 1971 (Division 16.5 (commencing with Section 38000)) applies as to off-highway motor vehicles, as described in Section 38001.

(i) Upon receipt of the abstract of a conviction under this section, the department shall not reinstate the privilege to operate a motor vehicle until the department receives proof of either the “Verification of Installation” form as described in paragraph (2) of subdivision (g) of Section 13386 or the Judicial Council Form I.D. 100.

(j) If Section 23573 is applicable, then subdivisions (g) and (i) are not applicable.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2008, Ch. 404, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 2009.)
-------------------------------------------

14601.8.

The judge may, in his or her discretion, allow any person convicted of a violation of Section 14601 or 14601.1 to serve his or her sentence on a sufficient number of consecutive weekend days to complete the sentence.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 14601.5 by Stats. 1992, Ch. 982, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 1993.)
-------------------------------------------

14602.

In accordance with subdivision (p) of Section 22651, a vehicle removed pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 2814.2 shall be released to the registered owner or his or her agent at any time the facility to which the vehicle has been removed is open upon presentation of the registered owner’s or his or her agent’s currently valid driver’s license to operate the vehicle and proof of current vehicle registration.

(History: Added by Stats. 2011, Ch. 653, Sec. 3.   (AB 353)   Effective January 1, 2012.)
-------------------------------------------

14602.1.

(a) Every state and local law enforcement agency, including, but not limited to, city police departments and county sheriffs’ offices, shall report to the Department of the California Highway Patrol, on a paper or electronic form developed and approved by the Department of the California Highway Patrol, all motor vehicle pursuit data.

(b) Effective January 1, 2006, the form shall require the reporting of all motor vehicle pursuit data, which shall include, but not be limited to, all of the following:

(1) Whether any person involved in a pursuit or a subsequent arrest was injured, specifying the nature of that injury. For all purposes of this section, the form shall differentiate between the suspect driver, a suspect passenger, and the peace officers involved.

(2) The violations that caused the pursuit to be initiated.

(3) The identity of the peace officers involved in the pursuit.

(4) The means or methods used to stop the suspect being pursued.

(5) All charges filed with the court by the district attorney.

(6) The conditions of the pursuit, including, but not limited to, all of the following:

(A) Duration.

(B) Mileage.

(C) Number of peace officers involved.

(D) Maximum number of law enforcement vehicles involved.

(E) Time of day.

(F) Weather conditions.
